Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-202.25
Disabled or blind honorably discharged veteran; property exemption; application; procedure; appeal.

Application for the exemption provided in section 77-202.24 shall be made to the county assessor on or before April 1 of every year. The county assessor shall approve or disapprove such application and shall notify the taxpayer of his or her decision within twenty days of the filing of the application. The taxpayer may appeal the decision of the county assessor to the county board of equalization within twenty days after notice of the decision is mailed by the county assessor.

The taxpayer may appeal any decision of the county board of equalization under this section pursuant to section 77-202.04.

Laws 1984, LB 835, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 36;

Laws 1997, LB 271, § 47.